Utah statutes.
63A-13-306.   Audit and investigation procedures.

(1) (a)  The office shall, in accordance with Section 63A-13-602, adopt administrative rules in consultation with providers and health care professionals subject to audit and investigation under this chapter to establish procedures for audits and investigations that are fair and consistent with the duties of the office under this chapter.

(b)  If the providers and health care professionals do not agree with the rules proposed or adopted by the office under Subsection (1)(a) or Section 63A-13-602, the providers or health care professionals may:

(i)  request a hearing for the proposed administrative rule or seek any other remedies under the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(ii)  request a review of the rule by the Legislature's Administrative Rules Review Committee created in Section 63G-3-501.

(2)  The office shall notify and educate providers and health care professionals subject to audit and investigation under this chapter of the providers' and health care professionals' responsibilities and rights under the administrative rules adopted by the office under the provisions of this section and Section 63A-13-602.



Enacted by Chapter 359, 2013 General Session

